North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 54. Adulteration of Grains.

§ 106-621.
Definitions.

For purposes of this Article, the following words or terms shall mean as follows:

Adulterated grain: Grain which contains any substance, such as, but not limited to, Captan, carbon tetrachloride, Malathion, Parathion, DDT, Dieldrin, Thiram, Endrin, Heptachlor, Maneb, Methoxychlor, 2, 6-dichloro, 4- nitroaniline, pentachloronitrobenzene, hexachlorobenzene, Demeton, Phorate, Carbophenothion, in excess of the tolerance for human or animal consumption established for such substances by the laws of the State or the regulations of the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, or both the State and the Department.

Commissioner: North Carolina Commissioner of Agriculture.

Grain: Corn, soybeans, milo, barley, oats, rye, and mixtures of them.

Grain dealer: Any person owning, controlling or operating an elevator, mill, warehouse or other similar structure or truck or tractor-trailer unit or both who buys, solicits for sale or resale, processes for sale or resale, contracts for storage or exchange or transfers grain after obtaining title to the grain of a North Carolina producer. The term “grain dealer” shall exclude producers, groups of producers, or contract feeders buying grain for consumption in their operations.

Person: Any individual, partnership, corporation, association, syndicate or other legal entity.

History.

1975, c. 659, s. 1; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-622.
Prohibited acts.

It shall be unlawful for any person to commit a prohibited act under

G.S. 106-122

with adulterated grain as defined in this Article and as the particular grain qualifies as adulterated food under

G.S. 106-129

.

History.

1975, c. 659, s. 2.

§ 106-623.
Penalty.

Any person violating the provisions of this Article shall be subject to the provisions of

G.S. 106-123

, 106-124 and 106-125.

History.

1975, c. 659, s. 3.

§ 106-624.
Sign furnished by Commissioner.

It shall be the duty of the Commissioner to cause to be prepared and furnished for a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) each to all grain dealers, as defined in this Article, in the State a sign not less than 11 x 15 inches, which shall contain information that it is a violation of law for any person to sell, offer for sale or deliver adulterated grain. Said sign shall also set out the penalties for violation of this Article. Duplicate signs, and replacement for signs lost, stolen, worn or otherwise unusable, shall be purchased from the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for a fee of five dollars ($5.00) per sign.

History.

1975, c. 659, s. 4; 1989, c. 544, s. 2; 1997-261, s. 109.

§ 106-625.
Posting of sign.

It shall be the duty of the owner, manager, or person in charge of the elevator, mill, warehouse or other similar structure to post in a conspicuous place, in view of the public, a sign or signs furnished to the grain dealer by the Commissioner pursuant to this Article.

History.

1975, c. 659, s. 5.

§ 106-626.
Nonposting not a defense.

It shall not be a defense to a prosecution under this Article that the sign required to be posted by

G.S. 106-625

hereof was not posted on the date of the alleged violation.

History.

1975, c. 659, s. 6.

§ 106-627.
Determination of adulteration.

For purposes of evidence under this Article, the grain dealer or his agent, upon receipt or pending receipt of suspected adulterated grain, may, at his discretion, call any law-enforcement officer to verify the sampling technique, [and] origin of sampled grain and subsequently send or request the law-enforcement officer to send the sample of grain in a sealed package to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for inspection and analysis in order to protect only the chain of evidence.

Upon [a] finding by the Department that said sample is adulterated grain, the Department shall notify the grain dealer of the results and return the sample to the original sender in a sealed package.

History.

1975, c. 659, s. 7; 1997-261, s. 66.

§ 106-628.
Applicability of Article.

The terms of this Article shall not apply to grain sold, offered for sale or delivered for purposes of planting.

History.

1975, c. 659, s. 8.

§§ 106-629 through 106-633.

Reserved for future codification purposes.